Washington statutes.
RCW 42.23.060

Local charter controls chapter.

If any provision of this chapter conflicts with any provision of a city or county charter, or with any provision of a city-county charter, the charter shall control if it contains stricter requirements than this chapter. The provisions of this chapter shall be considered as minimum standards to be enforced by municipalities.

[ 1999 c 261 s 5; 1961 c 268 s 16.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—1999 c 261: See note following RCW 42.23.030.